Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2144.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "average wholesale price" in section 9002 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9002. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Average wholesale price." The average wholesale price of all taxable liquid fuels and fuels, excluding the Federal excise tax and all liquid fuels taxes, shall be as follows:(1) After December 31, 2013, and before January 1, 2015, the average wholesale price shall be $1.87 per gallon.123456789101112131415161718 (2) After December 31, 2014, and before January 1, 2017, the average wholesale price shall be $2.49 per gallon.(3) After December 31, 2016, the average wholesale price shall be [as determined by the Department of Revenue for the 12-month period ending on the September 30 immediately prior to January 1 of the year for which the rate is to be set. In no case shall the average wholesale price be less than] $2.99 per gallon.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2144PN2772 - 2 - 12345678910